Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB376.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5538.1. Transporting dogs in external section of vehicle.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person carries or causes or allows to be carried a dog on the hood, roof, truck bed or any other external section of a vehicle on a public road in this Commonwealth.(b) Grading.--Upon conviction, a violation under this section shall be a summary offense punishable by:(1) A fine of not less than $50 nor more than $150 for a first violation.(2) A fine of not less than $150 nor more than $300 for a second violation.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) A fine of not less than $300 nor more than $500 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both, for a third or subsequent violation.(c) Exception.--This section shall not apply to a dog transported in a secured insulated cage or container which is designed to facilitate the safe transportation of a dog and prevents the dog from being exposed to outside weather conditions and from falling, jumping or being thrown from the vehicle.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0376PN0332 - 2 - 12345678910